Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4073.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
Of the Sixty Million Dollars ($60,000,000.00) appropriated from
the Statewide Recovery Fund established in Section 255 of Title 62
of the Oklahoma Statutes, to the Pandemic Relief Primary Source
Revolving Fund established in Section 255.2 of Title 62 of the
Oklahoma Statutes, in Section 1 of Enrolled House Bill No. 1022 of
the 2nd Extraordinary Session of the 58th Oklahoma Legislature, to
enhance industrial parks, airparks, and ports to cover costs related
to water, wastewater, sewer, and broadband projects eligible under

the provisions of the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 that support
sites or surrounding communities identified by the Department as
having such needs prior to the passage of this act and as discussed
in the Transportation, Infrastructure, and Rural Development Working
Group public meeting on September 15, 2022, the sum of Twenty-two
Million One Hundred Ninety-five Thousand Forty-five Dollars and
seventy-one cents ($22,195,045.71) shall be transferred to the
Statewide Recovery Fund for reappropriation. Such transfer shall be
consistent with the recommendations adopted by the Joint Committee
on Pandemic Relief Funding on April 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
Of the Twenty-five Million Dollars ($25,000,000.00) appropriated
from the Statewide Recovery Fund established in Section 255 of Title
62 of the Oklahoma Statutes, to the Emergency Relief and Impacts
Revolving Fund established in Section 683.24B of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes, in Section 1 of Enrolled House Bill No. 1020 of
the 1st Extraordinary Session of the 59th Oklahoma Legislature, to
administer the Emergency Relief and Impacts Grant Program, the sum
of Nine Million Eight Hundred Thirty-two Thousand Five Hundred
Ninety-six Dollars ($9,832,596.00) shall be transferred to the
Statewide Recovery Fund for reappropriation. Such transfer shall be
consistent with the recommendations adopted by the Joint Committee
on Pandemic Relief Funding on April 15, 2026.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
Of the Twelve Million Eight Hundred Two Thousand Nine Hundred
Ninety-three Dollars ($12,802,993.00) appropriated from the
Statewide Recovery Fund established in Section 255 of Title 62 of
the Oklahoma Statutes, to the Department of Human Services in
Section 1 of Enrolled Senate Bill No. 1186 of the 1st Regular
Session of the 59th Oklahoma Legislature, to establish a grant
program that provides assistance to food programs which support the
availability of and access to affordable and nutritious foods, the
sum of Three Hundred Eighty-four Thousand Two Hundred Fifty-three
Dollars and five cents ($384,253.05) shall be transferred to the
Statewide Recovery Fund for reappropriation. Such transfer shall be
consistent with the recommendations adopted by the Joint Committee
on Pandemic Relief Funding on April 15, 2026.
ENR. H. B. NO. 4073 Page 2

SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
Of the One Hundred Thirty Million Five Hundred Seven Thousand
Two Hundred Seventy-five Dollars ($130,507,275.00) appropriated from
the Statewide Recovery Fund established in Section 255 of Title 62
of the Oklahoma Statutes, to the Oklahoma Water Resources Board in
Section 10 of Enrolled Senate Bill No. 13 of the 2nd Extraordinary
Session of the 58th Oklahoma Legislature, for necessary statewide
strategic water infrastructure projects, the sum of Four Million Six
Hundred Thousand Dollars ($4,600,000.00) shall be transferred to the
Statewide Recovery Fund for reappropriation. Such transfer shall be
consistent with the recommendations adopted by the Joint Committee
on Pandemic Relief Funding on April 15, 2026.
SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
Of the Four Million Five Hundred Thirty-seven Thousand Five
Hundred Dollars ($4,537,500.00) appropriated from the Statewide
Recovery Fund established in Section 255 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, to the Health Care Workforce Development Revolving Fund
established in Section 697.21b of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes,
in Section 7 of Enrolled Senate Bill No. 1458 of the 2nd Regular
Session of the 58th Oklahoma Legislature, to establish a grant
program with Care Providers Oklahoma for the purpose of recruiting,
educating, and stabilizing Oklahoma's health care workforce, the sum
of One Million Thirty-three Thousand Six Hundred Eight Dollars
($1,033,608.00) shall be transferred to the Statewide Recovery Fund
for reappropriation. Such transfer shall be consistent with the
recommendations adopted by the Joint Committee on Pandemic Relief
Funding on April 15, 2026.
SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
Of the Three Hundred Thousand Dollars ($300,000.00) appropriated
from the Statewide Recovery Fund established in Section 255 of Title
62 of the Oklahoma Statutes, to the Health Care Workforce
Development Revolving Fund established in Section 697.21b of Title
70 of the Oklahoma Statutes, in Section 11 of Enrolled Senate Bill
No. 1458 of the 2nd Regular Session of the 58th Oklahoma
Legislature, to establish a grant program with Conners State College
for the purpose of recruiting, educating, and stabilizing Oklahoma's
health care workforce, the sum of Twenty-four Thousand Five Hundred
ENR. H. B. NO. 4073 Page 3

Seventy-nine Dollars ($24,579.00) shall be transferred to the
Statewide Recovery Fund for reappropriation. Such transfer shall be
consistent with the recommendations adopted by the Joint Committee
on Pandemic Relief Funding on April 15, 2026.
SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
Of the Fifty Million Dollars ($50,000,000.00) appropriated from
the Statewide Recovery Fund established in Section 255 of Title 62
of the Oklahoma Statutes, to the Oklahoma State University Medical
Authority in Section 1 of Enrolled House Bill No. 1012 of the Second
Extraordinary Session of the 58th Oklahoma Legislature, to provide
specific strategies and treatments to address the obesity epidemic
and other public health challenges, and to promote health and
nutrition awareness especially in rural parts of the state while
utilizing the collaboration of experts from various scientific
fields, the sum of Sixteen Million Two Hundred Thousand Dollars
($16,200,000.00) shall be transferred to the Statewide Recovery Fund
for reappropriation. Such transfer shall be consistent with the
recommendations adopted by the Joint Committee on Pandemic Relief
Funding on April 15, 2026.
SECTION 8. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
Of the Eighty-seven Million Dollars ($87,000,000.00)
appropriated from the Statewide Recovery Fund established in Section
255 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes, to the Department of
Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services in Section 1 of Enrolled
House Bill No. 1013 of the 2nd Extraordinary Session of the 58th
Oklahoma Legislature, to address the ongoing increased demand for
mental health services by constructing a replacement facility for
Griffin Memorial Hospital; provided, that such construction be
confined within a thirty-mile radius of the State Capitol Building,
the sum of Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00) shall be transferred
to the Statewide Recovery Fund for reappropriation. Such transfer
shall be consistent with the recommendations adopted by the Joint
Committee on Pandemic Relief Funding on April 15, 2026.
SECTION 9. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 4073 Page 4

Passed the House of Representatives the 21st day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 27th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 4073 Page 5